District of Columbia statutes.
34-1606

Removal of gas meters for neglect or refusal to pay amount due.

If any person or persons, supplied with gas, neglect or refuse to pay the amount due for the same, such company may stop the gas from entering the premises of such person or persons. In no case shall the officers, servants, or workmen of the company remove a meter from premises supplied by the company, unless by consent of the consumer, without first giving 48 hours notice in writing by leaving the same at the premises of the consumers; and said removal shall take place only between the hours of 8:00 a.m. and 2:00 p.m. It shall be lawful for Congress at any time hereafter to alter, amend, or repeal this section.

June 23, 1874, 18 Stat. 280, ch. 480, §§ 13, 14
Gas and electric corporations, excessive charges defense, see § 34-304.
1981 Ed., § 43-1105.
1973 Ed., § 43-1205.